test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kundams_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - кундамс: # Verb 'to catch' - full paradigm
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: кундан
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: кундат
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: кундай
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: кундатама
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: кундатада
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: кундайхть

     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: кундань
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: кундать
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: кундась
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: кундаме
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: кундаде
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: кундасть
     
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: кундалень
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: кундалеть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: кундаль
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: кундалеме
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: кундаледе
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: кундальхть
     
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: кундак
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: кундада
     
     кундамс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg1: кундазан
     кундамс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg2: кундазат
     кундамс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3: кундаза
#     кундамс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl1: кундастама
#     кундамс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl2: кундастада
     кундамс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3: кундаст

#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундасамак
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундасамань
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундасамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундасамазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундатя
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундатанза
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундатядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундатядязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундаса
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундасак
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундасы
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундасаськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундасасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундасазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундасамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундасамазь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундасамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундасамазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундатядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундатядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундатядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундатядязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундасайне
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундасайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундасыне
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундасаськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундасасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундасазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундамайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундамань
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундамазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундайхтень
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2: кунданзе
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундадязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундадязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундайне
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундазе
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундаськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундамазь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундамазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундадязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундадязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундадязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундадязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундайне
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундазень
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундаськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундалемайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундалемань
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундалемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундалемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундалийхтень
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундалензе
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундаледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундалине
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундалить
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундалезе
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундалеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундалесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундалезь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундалемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундалемазь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундалемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундалемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундаледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундалине
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундалить
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундалезень
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундалеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундалесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундалезь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: кундак
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: кундада
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундамак
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундак
     кундамс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундасть
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундандярясамак
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундандярясамань
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундандярясамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундандярясамазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундандярятя
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундандярятанза
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундандярятядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундандярятядязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундандяряса
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундандярясак
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундандярясы
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундандярясаськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундандярясасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундандярясазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундандярясамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундандярясамазь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундандярясамасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундандярясамазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундандярятядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундандярятядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундандярятядязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундандярятядязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундандярясайне
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундандярясайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундандярясыне
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундандярясаськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундандярясасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундандярясазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундалемайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундалемань
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундалемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундалемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундалийхтень
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундалензе
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундаледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундалине
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундалить
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундалезе
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундалеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундалесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундалезь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундалемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундалемазь
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундалемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундалемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундаледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундаледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундалине
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундалить
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундалезень
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундалеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундалесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундалезь
#
